Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.54, is amended to read: 609.54 EMBEZZLEMENT OF PUBLIC FUNDS. Whoever does an act which constitutes embezzlement under the provisions of Minnesota Constitution, article XI, section 13 may be sentenced as follows: (1) if the value of the funds so embezzled is $2,500, or less, to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) if such value is more than $2,500new text begin but less than $100,000new text end , to imprisonment for not more than ten years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or bothnew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (3) if such value is $100,000 or more, to imprisonment for not more than 20 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $50,000, or bothnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end